Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB690.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1003.1. Antifraud Ballot Paper; Vendor Certification; Antifraud Measures.--A vendor that contracts with a county board or the Secretary of the Commonwealth to provide ballot fraud countermeasures contained in or on paper used for ballots shall ensure that the paper is ISO 27001 certified, ISO 17025 certified, ISO 45001 certified, ISO 14001 certified, ISO 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 14298 certified or ISO 9001:2015 certified. The ballot fraud countermeasures shall also satisfy the following specifications:(1) Unique, controlled-supply watermarked Clearing Bank Specification One security paper.(2) Secure holographic foil that is a minimum of ten square millimeters and a maximum of twenty square millimeters with a proprietary original image in visible and multiple-color invisible ultraviolet inks. The visible overprint must be translucent so that the hologram image strikes through the printed image when viewed at different angles and must be cured in a way that any tampering of the image causes visible damage to the hologram. The holographic foil design and origination artwork must be exclusively owned and controlled by the security printer.(3) Branded overprint of any hologram that personalizes the hologram with customer logo.(4) Custom complex security background designs with banknote-level security.(5) Secure variable digital infill.(6) Thermochromic, tri-thermochromic, photochromic or optically variable inks.(7) Stealth numbering in ultraviolet, infrared or taggant inks.(8) Two-color rainbow print invisible ultraviolet numismatic designs with fine line security relief design that follows the primary image's design exactly and with a minimum line weight of 0.0424 millimeters.(9) Unique forensic fraud detection technology that is built into security inks.(10) Invisible ultraviolet microtext with an ultraviolet 20250SB0690PN0669 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 image minimum height of 0.3 millimeters and maximum height of 0.5 millimeters.(11) Raster imaging printed on seventy-five per centum of the document face in a minimum two-color invisible ultraviolet ink with a minimum line weight of 0.0242 millimeters and a maximum line weight of 0.084 millimeters.(12) Three-color invisible ultraviolet guilloche with an anticopy feature that is a custom geometric design specific to the document and with a high level of secure fine line detail consisting of multiple line weight with a minimum line weight of 0.242 millimeters.(13) Visible colored overt ink with embedded covert, near infrared machine-readable taggant that is capable of detection through proprietary infrared wavelength light source excitation and related infrared wavelength emission characteristics that confirm authenticity through a complex temporal measurement when read by a hand-held, rechargeable battery operated proprietary detector.(14) Molecular level, forensic-covert security feature included in the infrared taggant ink prescribed in paragraph (13). The proprietary molecular marker must be authenticated by laboratory analysis using gas chromatography mass spectrometry and the concentration in the related ink cannot be more than one part per million.(15) A security relief design technique that requires banknote graphics software. The design must protect infill areas from fraudulent alterations.(16) Multicolor invisible primary fluorescent elements that are printed in register to create a rainbow effect background. The image must incorporate multiple security graphic techniques 20250SB0690PN0669 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and be generated using anticounterfeit design software that is commercially available only for approved and accredited printers.(17) Serialized black QR code in which the same code is printed on the top left corner and bottom right corner and that can be read by native QR functions of iOS and Android smartphones that redirect the voter to a web-based voter information page and that tracks the voter's ballot as it is processed.(18) Paper that is eight and one-half inches wide by twenty-two inches long and that weighs eighty grams per square meter.(19) A paper receipt for the voter that is a perforated portion of the ballot, that is suitable for the voter to remove from the ballot after completing the ballot and that contains the lot number and sequence number of the sheet of paper on which the ballot is printed.Section 2. This act shall apply to elections on or after January 1, 2027.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0690PN0669 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819